North Carolina, session 2025, SB275.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 19A-23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 19A-23. Definitions.
For the purposes of this Article, the following terms, when used in the Article or the rules or
orders made pursuant thereto, shall be construed respectively to mean:
…
(5c) "Boarding kennel" means a facility or establishment which regularly offers to
the public the service of boarding six or more of any combination of dogs or
cats or both for a fee. Such a facility or establishment may, in addition to
providing shelter, food and water, offer grooming or other services for dogs
and/or cats.or cats or both.
…."
SECTION 2. The Board of Agriculture shall amend its rules for boarding kennels
consistent with the provisions of this act. In doing so, the Board may adopt temporary rules
following the procedures set forth in G.S. 150B-21.1.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
*S275-v-1*